Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1815
Compensation; to whom paid.

In a case in which a person is injured or killed as a result of conduct specified in the Nebraska Crime Victim's Reparations Act, or by any act of any other person which is within the description of offenses listed in such act, the committee or a hearing officer may order the payment of compensation:

(1) To or for the benefit of the injured person;

(2) In the case of personal injury or death of the victim, to a person responsible for the maintenance of the victim who has suffered pecuniary loss or incurred expenses as a result of the injury;

(3) In the case of death of the victim, to or for the benefit of any one or more of the dependents of the victim; or

(4) To a health care provider for costs incurred in treating or examining injuries of the victim arising out of the sexual assault, domestic assault, or child abuse as described in section 81-1807. Compensation paid to a victim shall not include such costs paid to a health care provider.

Laws 1978, LB 910, § 15;

Laws 1986, LB 540, § 16;

Laws 2021, LB497, § 4.

Children who were supported by their mother were entitled to recover under Crime Victim's Reparations Act for pecuniary losses incurred due to crime, including financial support of their mother for the remainder of minority, up to the statutory limit. Lambert v. Nebraska Cr. Vict. Rep. Bd., 214 Neb. 817, 336 N.W.2d 320 (1983).